ko: 타르 조율 체계: 볼트/러그 튜닝; 외부 튜닝 시스템; 고정형(튜닝 불가); 내부 튜닝 시스템; 키 튜닝(튜닝 키); 퀵 튠/레버 시스템; 로프 튜닝; 기타
lt-LT: Taro derinimo sistema: Derinimas varžtais / antgaliais; Išorinė derinimo sistema; Fiksuota (nederinama); Vidinė derinimo sistema; Derinama raktu (derinimo raktas); Greitasis derinimas / svirčių sistema; Derinama virve; Kita
cs: Systém ladění bubnu tar: Ladění šrouby; Externí systém ladění; Pevné (neladitelné); Vnitřní systém ladění; Ladění klíčem (ladicí klíč); Rychlé ladění / pákový systém; Ladění provazy; Jiné
hr-HR: Sustav za podešavanje katrana: Ugađanje vijcima/zatezačima; Vanjski sustav ugađanja; Fiksno (ne ugađa se); Unutarnji sustav ugađanja; Ugađanje ključem; Brzo ugađanje / sustav poluge; Ugađanje užetom; Ostalo
de: Stimmsystem der Tar: Schrauben-/Spannböckchenstimmung; Externes Stimmsystem; Fixiert (nicht stimmbar); Internes Stimmsystem; Schlüsselgestimmt (Stimmschlüssel); Schnelltimm- / Hebelsystem; Seilstimmung; Sonstige
nb: Tjærejusteringssystem: Bolt-/skruestemming; Utvendig stemmesystem; Fast (ikke stembar); Innvendig stemmesystem; Nøkkelstemt (stemmenøkkel); Hurtigstemming / spaksystem; Taustemming; Annet
zh-TW: 土耳其框鼓調音系統: 螺栓/鼓耳調音; 外部調音系統; 固定式 (不可調音); 內部調音系統; 鼓鎖調音 (調音扳手); 快速調音 / 拉桿系統; 繩索調音; 其他
zh-CN: 塔尔鼓调音系统: 螺栓/鼓耳调音; 外部调音系统; 固定（不可调）; 内部调音系统; 鼓环调音（调音键）; 快速调音/杠杆系统; 绳索调音; 其他
sv: Tar-stämningssystem: Bult-/stämskruv; Externt stämsystem; Fast (ej stämbar); Internt stämsystem; Nyckelstämd (stämnyckel); Snabbtuning / spaksystem; Repstämd; Annat
el: Σύστημα κουρδίσματος ταρ: Κούρδισμα με μπουλόνια/ωτίδες; Εξωτερικό σύστημα κουρδίσματος; Σταθερό (χωρίς δυνατότητα κουρδίσματος); Εσωτερικό σύστημα κουρδίσματος; Κούρδισμα με κλειδί (κλειδί κουρδίσματος); Σύστημα γρήγορου κουρδίσματος / μοχλού; Κούρδισμα με σκοινί; Άλλο
sk-SK: Ladiaci systém taru: Ladenie pomocou skrutiek/výstupkov; Vonkajší ladiaci systém; Pevné (neladiteľné); Vnútorný ladiaci systém; Ladenie pomocou ladiaceho kľúča; Rýchle ladenie / pákový systém; Ladenie pomocou povrazov; Iné
ru: Система настройки тара: Настройка болтами; Внешняя система настройки; Фиксированный (без настройки); Внутренняя система настройки; Настройка ключом; Быстрая настройка / рычажная система; Верёвочная настройка; Другое
nl: Tar stemsysteem: Bout-/spanklauwstemming; Extern stemsysteem; Vast (niet-stembaar); Intern stemsysteem; Sleutelgestemd (stemsleutel); Quick-tune / hefboomsysteem; Touwstemming; Overig
tr: Tar akort sistemi: Cıvata/kulp ile akort; Harici akort sistemi; Sabit (akort edilemez); Dahili akort sistemi; Anahtarla akort (akort anahtarı); Hızlı akort / mandal sistemi; İple akort; Diğer
vi: Hệ thống điều chỉnh Tar: Chỉnh bằng bu-lông/tai; Hệ thống chỉnh âm bên ngoài; Cố định (không thể chỉnh); Hệ thống chỉnh âm bên trong; Chỉnh bằng khóa (khóa chỉnh âm); Chỉnh nhanh / hệ thống đòn bẩy; Chỉnh bằng dây; Khác
ro-RO: Sistem de acordaj pentru tar: Acordare cu șurub/tijă; Sistem de acordare extern; Fix (neacordabil); Sistem de acordare intern; Acordat cu cheie (cheie de acordare); Acordare rapidă / sistem cu manetă; Acordare cu sfoară; Altele
pt-BR: Tar sistema de afinação: Afinação por parafuso/pino; Sistema de afinação externo; Fixo (não afinável); Sistema de afinação interno; Afinação por chave; Afinação rápida/sistema de alavanca; Afinação por corda; Outro
pl: System strojenia bębna tar: Strojenie śrubami; Zewnętrzny system strojenia; Stały (niestrajalny); Wewnętrzny system strojenia; Strojenie kluczem; Szybkie strojenie / system dźwigniowy; Strojenie sznurkiem; Inny
fr: Système d’accordage du tar: Accordage par boulons/tirants; Système d’accordage externe; Fixe (non accordable); Système d’accordage interne; Accordage par clé (clé d’accordage); Accordage rapide/système de levier; Accordage par corde; Autre
en: Tar tuning system: Bolt/lug tuning; External tuning system; Fixed (non-tunable); Internal tuning system; Key-tuned (tuning key); Quick-tune / lever system; Rope tuning; Other
es: Sistema de ajuste del tar: Afinación por perno/bellota; Sistema de afinación externo; Fijo (no afinable); Sistema de afinación interno; Afinado con llave (llave de afinación); Afinación rápida / sistema de palanca; Afinación por cuerda; Otro
pt-PT: Sistema de afinação do tar: Afinação por parafusos/porcas; Sistema de afinação externo; Fixo (não afinável); Sistema de afinação interno; Afinado por chave (chave de afinação); Afinação rápida / sistema de alavanca; Afinação por corda; Outro
sl-SI: Sistem uglaševanja tara: Uglasitev z vijaki/zatiči; Zunanji uglasitveni sistem; Fiksno (ni mogoče uglasiti); Notranji uglasitveni sistem; Uglasitev s ključem (ključ za uglasitev); Sistem hitre uglasitve / sistem ročice; Uglasitev z vrvjo; Drugo
bg-BG: Система за настройване на тар: Настройка с болт/щифт; Външна система за настройка; Фиксирана (без настройка); Вътрешна система за настройка; Настройка с ключ; Бърза настройка / система с лост; Настройка с въже; Друго
ja: Tar調律方式: ボルト/ラグチューニング; 外部チューニングシステム; 固定 (チューニング不可); 内部チューニングシステム; キーチューニング (チューニングキー); クイックチューン/レバーシステム; ロープチューニング; その他
it: Sistema di regolazione del tar: Accordatura a bulloni/tiranti; Sistema di accordatura esterno; Fissa (non accordabile); Sistema di accordatura interno; Accordatura a chiave (chiave di accordatura); Sistema ad accordatura rapida / leva; Accordatura a corda; Altro
th: ระบบปรับแต่งทาร์: ตั้งเสียงด้วยโบลต์/สลัก; ระบบตั้งเสียงภายนอก; คงที่ (ตั้งเสียงไม่ได้); ระบบตั้งเสียงภายใน; ตั้งเสียงด้วยประแจ (ประแจตั้งเสียง); ตั้งเสียงด่วน / ระบบคันโยก; ตั้งเสียงด้วยเชือก; อื่นๆ
fi: Tar-rummun viritysjärjestelmä: Pultti-/korvakeviritys; Ulkoinen viritysjärjestelmä; Kiinteä (ei viritettävä); Sisäinen viritysjärjestelmä; Avainviritettävä (viritysavain); Pikaviritys / vipujärjestelmä; Nyöriviritys; Muu
da: Stemmesystem for tar: Bolt-/beslagstemning; Udvendigt stemmesystem; Fast (kan ikke stemmes); Indvendigt stemmesystem; Nøglestemt (stemmenøgle); Quick-tune-/grebsystem; Rebstemning; Andet
hu: Tar hangolási rendszere: Csavaros / babás hangolás; Külső hangolórendszer; Fix (nem hangolható); Belső hangolórendszer; Kulccsal hangolható; Gyorshangolós / karos rendszer; Köteles hangolás; Egyéb